Mississippi, session 2026, HB4141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Peter Fulton of Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Perjury in Oktibbeha County, on April 29, 1992, for which he was sentenced to serve thirty-six (36) months under the supervision of the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He violated probation and it was revoked.  On November 2, 1992, he was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for the crime of Burglary-Residential, and three (3) years probation. He was discharged on November 3, 1998.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.